Utah statutes.
63M-1-2905.   Application process.

(1)  A tax credit applicant may apply to the office to receive a tax credit certificate by filing an application with the office:

(a) on or before the quarterly deadline established by the office by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act; and

(b)  on a form and in the manner prescribed by the office.

(2)  The application shall include:

(a)  tax return information as required by the office that is necessary for the office to determine eligibility for and the amount of a tax credit; and

(b)  other documentation as required by the office.

(3)  As part of the application required by this section, a tax credit applicant shall sign a separate document that expressly directs and authorizes the State Tax Commission to disclose to the office the tax credit certificate recipient's tax returns and other information concerning the tax credit certificate that:

(a)  would otherwise be subject to confidentiality under Section 59-1-403 or Section 6103, Internal Revenue Code; and

(b)  are necessary for the office to determine eligibility for and the amount of a tax credit under this part.

(4)  Upon receipt of the document described in Subsection (3), the State Tax Commission shall provide the office with the tax returns and other information requested by the office that the tax credit applicant directed or authorized the State Tax Commission to provide to the office, including information necessary to determine eligibility for the amount of a tax credit.

(5)  If the office determines that the information a tax credit applicant provides is inadequate to provide a reasonable justification for authorizing a tax credit, the office shall:

(a)  deny the tax credit; or

(b)  inform the tax credit applicant that the information is inadequate and ask the tax credit applicant to submit new or additional documentation.



Amended by Chapter 423, 2012 General Session

